Illinois, session 104th, HB5213.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1038 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Community Reintegration Housing Fund. 8    Section 10. The Department of Human Services Act is 9amended by adding Section 1-105 as follows: 10    (20 ILCS 1305/1-105 new)11    Sec. 1-105. The Community Reintegration Housing Fund.12    (a) There is hereby created the Community Housing 13Reintegration Fund as a special fund in the State treasury. 14The Fund shall be administered by the Department of Human 15Services or other entity designated by the Governor. The 16purpose of the Fund is to better implement the United States 17Supreme Court decision in Olmstead v. L. C., 527 U.S. 581 18(1999), reduce institutionalization of persons needing 19long-term care, and rebalance the long-term care system toward 20home-based and community-based services by providing ongoing 21housing assistance to eligible persons who are either (i)   HB5213- 2 -LRB104 18433 HLH 31875 b1transitioning out of congregate long-term care settings into 2less restrictive independent and community-based housing or 3(ii) facing impending placement in a congregate long-term care 4facility due to lack of affordable accessible housing. Moneys 5in the Fund may be used only for housing-related costs. 6    (b) There shall be deposited into the Fund such amounts as 7may become available under this Act, including, but not 8limited to: 9        (1) amounts as provided in Section 31-35 of the Real 10    Estate Transfer Tax Law; 11        (2) any appropriations, grants, gifts, or other aid 12    from any federal or State body, local government, or any 13    other public organization or private individual made to 14    the Fund; or 15        (3) other funds as appropriated by the General 16    Assembly. 17    (c) Persons eligible for housing assistance benefits from 18the Community Reintegration Housing Fund include:19        (1) persons in a long-term care facility for whom lack 20    of appropriate affordable housing is a primary barrier to 21    transitioning into a less restrictive community 22    environment; or23        (2) persons who are facing impending placement in a 24    long-term care facility and who are at or below 80% of the 25    median area income and are (i) disabled, blind, or over 26    age 65 or (ii) otherwise eligible for benefits under the   HB5213- 3 -LRB104 18433 HLH 31875 b1    Title XVI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1381 et 2    seq., or Title XIX 42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq. 3    (d) Within 6 months after the effective date of this 4amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, in consultation 5with the Illinois Long Term Care Ombudsman, the designated 6State Protection and Advocacy agency, and the Department of 7Healthcare and Family Services, the Department of Human 8Services shall adopt rules and procedures for the 9administration of the Fund. The Fund's housing assistance 10shall be similar to the federal Section 8 Housing Choice 11Voucher program in that assistance payments shall be 12structured to ensure that beneficiaries pay no more than 30% 13of their income as housing costs and that beneficiaries may 14relocate to a different residence that meets program rules 15without losing housing benefits. 16    (d) As used in this Section: 17    "Facility" means a nursing home, state operated 18developmental center, group home, or supportive living 19facility.  20    Section 15. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 21Sections 31-10, 31-15, and 31-35 as follows: 22    (35 ILCS 200/31-10)23    Sec. 31-10. Imposition of tax. A tax is imposed on the 24privilege of transferring title to real estate located in   HB5213- 4 -LRB104 18433 HLH 31875 b1Illinois, on the privilege of transferring a beneficial 2interest in real property located in Illinois, and on the 3privilege of transferring a controlling interest in a real 4estate entity owning property located in Illinois. Before July 51, 2026, the tax shall be imposed , at the rate of 50¢ for each 6$500 of value or fraction of $500 stated in the declaration 7required by Section 31-25. On and after July 1, 2026, the tax 8shall be imposed at the rate of $0.75 for each $500 of value or 9fraction of $500 stated in the declaration required by Section 1031-25. If, however, the transferring document states that the 11real estate, beneficial interest, or controlling interest is 12transferred subject to a mortgage, the amount of the mortgage 13remaining outstanding at the time of transfer shall not be 14included in the basis of computing the tax. The tax is due if 15the transfer is made by one or more related transactions or 16involves one or more persons or entities and whether or not a 17document is recorded. 18(Source: P.A. 93-657, eff. 6-1-04; 93-1099, eff. 6-1-05.) 19    (35 ILCS 200/31-15)20    Sec. 31-15. Collection of tax. 21    (a) Paper revenue stamps. The tax shall be collected by 22the recorder or registrar of titles of the county in which the 23property is situated through the sale of revenue stamps, the 24design, denominations and form of which shall be prescribed by 25the Department. The revenue stamps shall be sold by the   HB5213- 5 -LRB104 18433 HLH 31875 b1Department to the recorder or registrar of titles who shall 2cause them to be sold for the purposes prescribed. Before July 31, 2026, the The Department shall charge at a rate of 50¢ per 4$500 of value in units of not less than $500. On and after July 51, 2026, the Department shall charge at a rate of 50¢ per $500 6of value in units of not less than $500. The recorder or 7registrar of titles of the several counties shall sell the 8revenue stamps at a rate of 50¢ per $500 of value or fraction 9of $500. The recorder or registrar of titles may use the 10proceeds for the purchase of revenue stamps from the 11Department. The Department must establish a system to allow 12the recorder or registrar of titles to purchase the revenue 13stamps electronically and must deliver the electronically 14purchased stamps to the recorder or registrar of titles. Paper 15revenue stamps shall be phased out by December 31, 2025. 16Thereafter, all counties shall issue electronic revenue stamps 17or alternative indicia. 18    (b) Electronic revenue stamp or alternative indicia. If 19the recorder or registrar of titles uses an electronic revenue 20stamp or alternative indicia, the recorder or registrar of 21titles shall electronically file a return using an electronic 22system required by the Department and electronically remit the 23tax to the Department via a debit payment or ACH credit on or 24before the 10th day of the month following the month in which 25the tax was required to be collected. The return shall 26disclose the tax collected and other information that the   HB5213- 6 -LRB104 18433 HLH 31875 b1Department may reasonably require. The return shall be filed 2using an electronic format prescribed by the Department 3through the MyDec system or another electronic system used by 4the Department. 5    (c) The recordation of all transactions involving the sale 6of property shall require the activity to be transmitted to 7the Department through the use of the Department's electronic 8system, whether paper revenue stamps, electronic revenue 9stamps, or alternative indicia is employed. 10    If a return is not filed or the tax is not fully paid as 11required under this Section within 15 days of the required 12time period, the Department may eliminate the recorder or 13registrar of titles' ability to electronically file its 14returns and electronically remit the tax until such time as 15the recorder or registrar of titles fully remits the return 16and tax amount due. 17(Source: P.A. 103-963, eff. 8-9-24.) 18    (35 ILCS 200/31-35)19    Sec. 31-35. Deposit of tax revenue. 20    (a) Beginning on June 6, 2002 (the effective date of 21Public Act 92-536) and through June 30, 2003, of the moneys 22collected under Section 31-15, 50% shall be deposited into the 23Illinois Affordable Housing Trust Fund, 20% into the Open 24Space Lands Acquisition and Development Fund, 5% into the 25Natural Areas Acquisition Fund, and 25% into the General   HB5213- 7 -LRB104 18433 HLH 31875 b1Revenue Fund.2    (b) Beginning July 1, 2003, and through June 30, 2025, of 3the moneys collected under Section 31-15, 50% shall be 4deposited into the Illinois Affordable Housing Trust Fund, 35% 5into the Open Space Lands Acquisition and Development Fund, 6and 15% into the Natural Areas Acquisition Fund.7    (c) Beginning July 1, 2025 and through June 30, 2026, of 8the moneys collected under Section 31-15, the first $300,000 9shall be deposited into the Governor's Administrative Fund 10each fiscal year. After all required deposits into the 11Governor's Administrative Fund have been made, the remainder 12shall be deposited as follows:13        (1) 50% into the Illinois Affordable Housing Trust 14    Fund;15        (2) 35% into the Open Space Lands Acquisition and 16    Development Fund; and17        (3) 15% into the Natural Areas Acquisition Fund. 18    (d) Beginning July 1, 2026, of the moneys collected under 19Section 31-15, the first $300,000 shall be deposited into the 20Governor's Administrative Fund each fiscal year. After all 21required deposits into the Governor's Administrative Fund have 22been made, the remainder shall be deposited as follows: 23        (1) 34% into the Illinois Affordable Housing Trust 24    Fund; 25        (2) 24% into the Open Space Lands Acquisition and 26    Development Fund;   HB5213- 8 -LRB104 18433 HLH 31875 b1        (3) 10% into the Natural Areas Acquisition Fund; and 2        (4) 32% into the Community Reintegration Housing Fund. 3(Source: P.A. 104-2, eff. 6-16-25.) 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.